apertium-sme-sma.sma.lexc
LEXICON EVEN_ESS
  +Ess:%>ine         FINAL1 ;


! Old, not used, retained at the moment to remember the history:
!LEXICON I-CLASS ! Links from propernoun (revise?)
!  :%>i			IJ-CASE ;	! others have -ine etc.
!                I-EVEN ;
!                I-ODD ;
!
!LEXICON I-EVEN
!  +Pl+Ela:%>ijste	FINAL1	;	! Ela has -iste
!
!LEXICON I-ODD
!  +Pl+Ela:%>ijstie	FINAL1	;	! Ela has -iste



! Special for cns-final names, due to nomsg
! =========================================

! LEXICON CNAME_ODD_SG !(still) not in use
!  NOMSG ;
!  OBLIQUE_COMMON ;
!  OBLIQUE_ODD ;
!
!LEXICON CNAME_EVEN_SG !(still) not in use
! NOMSG ;
! OBLIQUE_COMMON ;
! OBLIQUE_EVEN ;


! LEXICON NOMSG !(still) not in use
!   +Sg+Nom:  	        FINAL1 ;
! 
! LEXICON OBLIQUE_COMMON !(still) not in use
!   +Sg+Acc:e%>m      FINAL1 ;
!   +Sg+Gen:e%>n      FINAL1 ;
! 
! LEXICON OBLIQUE_ODD !(still) not in use
!   +Sg+Ine:e%>snie   FINAL1 ;
!   +Sg+Ela:e%>stie   FINAL1 ;
!   +Sg+Com:e%>nie    FINAL1 ;

! LEXICON OBLIQUE_EVEN !(still) not in use
!   +Sg+Ine:e%>sne    FINAL1 ;
!   +Sg+Ela:e%>ste    FINAL1 ;
!   +Sg+Com:e%>ne     FINAL1 ;

! ---- Nominal derivation sublexica ----

LEXICON GIERIEHTSADTJE
  +Sg:           NIEJTE_SG  ;
  +Pl:           NIEJTE_PL  ;
                 EVEN_ESS ;
  +SgNomCmp:e    R ;
  +SgGenCmp:e%>n R ;
  +PlGenCmp:%>i  R ;

LEXICON GÅATETJE
 +Sg: N_ODD_SG ;
 +Pl: N_ODD_PL ;
      N_ODD_ESS ;
 +SgNomCmp:e            R ;
 +SgGenCmp:e%>n        R ;
 +PlGenCmp:%>%^DISIMPi R ;
 
  
LEXICON NomActOdd
 +N+Sg: N_ODD_SG ;
 +N+Pl: N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:e%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:e%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  
LEXICON NomActEven
  +N+Sg: N_IE_SG ;
  +N+Pl: N_IE_PL ;
  +N:    N_IE_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:ie              R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:ie%>n           R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:ie%>j           R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp+Uml:%>%^iUMLi R ;

LEXICON LDAHKE
  +N+Sg:           NIEJTE_SG  ;
  +N+Pl:           NIEJTE_PL  ;
  +N:              EVEN_ESS ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N:e%»tj   GÅATETJE ;
  
!LEXICON DAHKE 


! ===========================================
! Adjectives: Adjectival inflection sublexica
! ===========================================

! Basic adjectival lexica, infl types
! -----------------------------------

! even stems
! - - - - - 

! type 1

!!1a: Vowel stem in a and p, c = be
!
!    a = V, p = V, c = Vbe
!    plaave måvhkah, pred : måvhkah leah plaave
!    plaave, plaave ("blå")
!    plaavebe  / plååvebe
!    plaavemes

!LEXICON NULL-NULL-EVEN
!     ATTR-0 ;
!     PRED-0 ;
!     EVENCOMP ;

!!1b: -s in a and p, c = be/hkåbpoe
!
!     a = s, p = s, c = suffixes (be/hkåbpoe)
! 
! Subgroups:
! 
! * Vokalstamme med omlyd i komparativ: 
! * Vokalstamme med eller utan omlyd i komparativ
! * Vokalstamme utan omlyd i komparativ
! * Konsonantstamme


LEXICON NULL-NULL-EVEN 
ATTR-0 ;
PRED-0 ;

LEXICON e-e-EVEN-1
  :e   ATTR-0 ;
  :e   PRED-0 ;
       eCASE ;
 :e   EVENCOMP ; ! check this!
  
LEXICON i-i-EVEN-1
  :e   ATTR-0 ;
  :e   PRED-0 ;
       eCASE ;
 :e   EVENCOMP ; ! check this!

LEXICON e-e-EVENNOCOMP-1
  :e   ATTR-0 ;
  :e   PRED-0 ;
       eCASE ;



LEXICON a-a-EVENNOCOMP-1
  :a   ATTR-0 ;
  :a   PRED-0 ;
       aCASE ;

LEXICON ie-ie-EVEN-1
  :ie   ATTR-0 ;
  :ie   PRED-0 ;
       ieCASE ;
 :ie  EVENCOMP ; ! check this!

LEXICON ie-ie-EVENNOCOMP-1
  :ie   ATTR-0 ;
  :ie   PRED-0 ;
       ieCASE ;
       
LEXICON es-es-EVEN-1
  :e   ATTR-S ;
  :e   PRED-S ;
       eCASE ;
 :e  EVENCOMP ; ! check this!

LEXICON es-es-EVENNOCOMP-1
  :e   ATTR-S ;
  :e   PRED-S ;
       eCASE ;


LEXICON as-as-EVEN-1
  :a   ATTR-S ;
  :a   PRED-S ;
       aCASE ;
 :a  EVENCOMP ; ! check this!

LEXICON ies-ies-EVEN-1
  :ie   ATTR-S ;
  :ie   PRED-S ;
       ieCASE ;
 :ie  EVENCOMP ; ! check this!

LEXICON ies-ies-EVENNOCOMP-1
  :ie   ATTR-S ;
  :ie   PRED-S ;

LEXICON oes-oes-EVEN-1
  :oe   ATTR-S ;
  :oe   PRED-S ;
       oeCASE ;
 :oe  EVENCOMP_oe ; ! check this!

LEXICON Cs-Cs-EVEN-1
     ATTR-S ;
     PRED-S ;
     eCASE ;
 :e  EVENCOMP ; ! check this! -igs is the same as ihks - ebe/emes 

LEXICON ihks-ihks-EVEN-1
          ATTR-S ;
!   !have they got case?
          PRED-S ;
! :e   EVENCOMP ; !these words do not seem to have comparation

LEXICON Ch-Ch-EVEN-1 ! Attr= h, Comp =Even( Jïjtje-raarh) 
    ATTR-H ;
    PRED-H ;

LEXICON h-h-EVEN-1 ! Attr= h, pred= h, comp=even, case= even
     ATTR-H ;
     PRED-H ;
     EVENCOMP ;


LEXICON MAST
     ATTR-S ;
  :e PRED-N ;

! type 2
LEXICON e-es-EVEN-2
 :e    ATTR-0 ;
 :e    PRED-S ;
       eCASE ;
 :e  EVENCOMP ;

LEXICON e-es-EVENNOCOMP-2
 :e    ATTR-0 ;
 :e    PRED-S ;
       eCASE ;
       
LEXICON e-es-EVENODD-2
 :e    ATTR-0 ;
 :e    PRED-S ;
       eCASE ;
 :es  ODDCASE ;
+A+Sg+Nom:es         FINAL1 ;
+A+SgNomCmp:es            R ;
 :e  EVENCOMP ;
 :es ODDCOMP ;




! type 3
LEXICON es-e-EVEN-3 
 :e    ATTR-S ;
 :e    PRED-0 ;
       eCASE ;
 :e   EVENCOMP ;



LEXICON as-a-EVEN-3! attr= s, pred= e, comp=EVEN(ebe,emes), Case/Substantvien hammoe= EVEN
 :a    ATTR-S ;
 :a    PRED-0 ;
       aCASE ;
 :a  EVENCOMP ;


LEXICON oes-oe-EVEN-3 !attr= s, pred= Ø, Comp= EVEN(ebe, emes) case/substantiven hammoe= Even
 :oe    ATTR-S ;
 :oe    PRED-0 ;
       oeCASE ;
 :oe   EVENCOMP_oe ;

LEXICON ies-ie-EVEN-3! attr= s, predikat = Ø, comp jih case: even (ebe/emes/esne) 
 :ie    ATTR-S ;
 :ie    PRED-0 ;
        ieCASE ;
 :ie  EVENCOMP ;
 
LEXICON ies-ie-EVENNOCOMP-3! attr= s, predikat = Ø, comp jih case: even (ebe/emes/esne) 
 :ie    ATTR-S ;
 :ie    PRED-0 ;

LEXICON ies-ies-ie-EVEN-3! Attr=s, Prediakt = s jih Ø, Comp jih caese= even (ebe/emes/esne) 
 :ie   ATTR-S ;! (tsåekies, tsåekie/tsåekies) ved adverbial= substantiv/adjektiv
 :ie    PRED-0 ;
        ieCASE ;
 :ie  EVENCOMP ;

LEXICON ies-ies-ie-EVENNOCOMP-3! Attr=s, Prediakt = s jih Ø, Comp jih caese= even (ebe/emes/esne) 
 :ie   ATTR-S ;! (tsåekies, tsåekie/tsåekies) ved adverbial= substantiv/adjektiv
 :ie    PRED-0 ;
        ieCASE ;

LEXICON as-as-a-EVEN-3! Attr=s, Prediakt = s jih Ø, Comp jih caese= even (ebe/emes/esne) 
 :a   ATTR-S ;! (tsåekies, tsåekie/tsåekies) ved adverbial= substantiv/adjektiv
 :a    PRED-0 ;
       aCASE ;
 :a   EVENCOMP ;

LEXICON oes-oes-oe-EVEN-3! Attr=s, Prediakt = s jih Ø, Comp jih caese= even (ebe/emes/esne) 
 :oe   ATTR-S ;! (tsåekies, tsåekie/tsåekies) ved adverbial= substantiv/adjektiv
 :oe    PRED-0 ;
        oeCASE ;
 :oe  EVENCOMP_oe ;







! ODD-stems (odd stem declension)
! ===============================


! type 1
LEXICON NULL-NULL-ODD-1
     ATTR-0 ;
     PRED-0 ;

LEXICON h-h-ODD-1
     ATTR-H ;
     PRED-H ;
 :hk  ODDCOMP ;

LEXICON h-h-ODDNOCOMP-1
     ATTR-H ;
     PRED-H ;



LEXICON hth-hth-ODD-1
 :%^DISIMP    ATTR-H ;
 :%^DISIMP    PRED-H ;
    ODDCASE ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^DISIMPh         FINAL1 ;
+A+SgNomCmp:%^DISIMPh            R ;
    ODDCOMP ;


LEXICON Ce-Ce-ODD-1 !bårreske
 :%^DISIMPe     ATTR-0 ;
 :%^DISIMPe     PRED-0 ;
    ODDCASE ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^DISIMPe         FINAL1 ;
+A+SgNomCmp:%^DISIMPe            R ;
    ODDCOMP ;
 
 
LEXICON Ce-Ce-ODDEVEN-1 !rudtjege
 :ege     ATTR-0 ;
 :ege     PRED-0 ;
 :eg  ODDCASE ;
+A+Sg+Nom:eg%^DISIMPe         FINAL1 ;
+A+SgNomCmp:eg%^DISIMPe            R ;
+A+Sg:           NIEJTE_SG  ;
+A+Pl:           NIEJTE_PL  ;
+A:              EVEN_ESS ;
+A+SgNomCmp:e    R ;
+A+SgGenCmp:e%>n R ;
+A+PlGenCmp:%>i  R ;
 :eg  ODDCOMP ;
 :e   EVENCOMP ;

 
LEXICON Ce-Ce-ODDNOCOMP-1
 :e     ATTR-0 ;
 :e     PRED-0 ;
 :  ODDCASE ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^DISIMPe         FINAL1 ;
+A+SgNomCmp:%^DISIMPe            R ;
       
LEXICON s-s-ODD-1
     ATTR-S ;
     PRED-S ;
 :s ODDCOMP ;

LEXICON s-s-ODDNOCOMP-1
     ATTR-S ;
     PRED-S ;


LEXICON s-s-ODDhk-1
     ATTR-S ;
     PRED-S ;
 :hk ODDCOMP ;

LEXICON oes-oes-ODDahk-1
   :oe  ATTR-S ;
   :oe  PRED-S ;
   :ahk ODDCOMP ;

LEXICON oes-oes-ODDas-1
   :oe  ATTR-S ;
   :oe  PRED-S ;
   :as ODDCOMP ;


LEXICON s-s-ODDUML-1
 :ie    ATTR-S ;
 :ie    PRED-S ;
 :%^iUMLas ODDCOMP ;

LEXICON Adjective
aareh:aare h-h-EVEN-1 ; !aarebi, aaremes
aareh:aare h-h-ODD-1 ; !aarehkåbpoe, aarehkommes 'hk', 'g' ,'ht' ? 
båajhtoeh:båajhtoe h-h-ODD-1 ; 
båeries+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:båer s-s-ODDUML-1 ; !
eensi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:eensi NULL-NULL-ODD-1 ; !
gamte:gamt e-e-EVENNOCOMP-1 ; !UMALUT COMP : gamte-gemtebe-gemtemes ! e(1)-stamme
gejhkie:gejhk ie-ie-EVEN-1 ; 
isveligks:isveligk Cs-Cs-EVEN-1 ; 
jïlle:jïll e-e-EVENNOCOMP-1 ; ! e(1)-stamme
kraevies:kraev ies-ies-EVEN-1 ; 
loeves:loev e-es-EVEN-2 ; 
låpsoes:låpsoe s-s-ODD-1 ; 
lïhkes:lïhk es-es-EVEN-1 ; 
löövles:löövl es-es-EVENNOCOMP-1 ; ! (omlyd i komp:lïevlebe) ! e(3)-stamme
nannoes:nannoe s-s-ODD-1 ; 
neahkoeh:neahkoe h-h-ODD-1 ; 
noere:noer e-e-EVENNOCOMP-1 ; !UMLAUT COMP- noere-nuerebe-nööremes ! e(1)-stamme
orre+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:orr e-e-EVEN-1 ; !UMLAUT COMP : orre-urrebe-urremes -orrebe-orremes ! e(1)-stamme eller e(2)-stamme 
plaave:plaav e-e-EVENNOCOMP-1 ; !UMLAUT COMP: plaave-plaevebe-plaavemes ! e(1)-stamme 
plaave:plaav e-es-EVENNOCOMP-2 ; !UMLAUT COMP : plaevebe,plaavemes ! e(1)-stamme
radtjoes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:radtj oes-oes-ODDahk-1 ; !
rööpses:rööps es-es-EVENNOCOMP-1 ; !UMLAUT COMP = ruepsebe, rööpsemes ! e(3)-stamme
saavrehke:saavrehk Ce-Ce-ODD-1 ; !
stoerre+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:stoerr e-e-EVENNOCOMP-1 ; ! UMLAUT COMP:stoerre-stuerebe-stööremes !
stååvehke:stååvehk Ce-Ce-ODD-1 ; 
tjeehpes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:tjeehp es-es-EVEN-1 ; ![tjææ-] e(3) -stamme !
tjeehpes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:tjeehpe s-s-ODD-1 ; !
